California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) The director may, for the department and at the request and with the consent of a board within the department on whose behalf the contract is to be made, enter into contracts pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 11250) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code for and on behalf of any board within the department.

(b) In accordance with subdivision (a), the director may, in his or her discretion, negotiate and execute contracts for examination purposes, which include provisions that hold harmless a contractor where liability
 resulting from a contract between a board in the department and the contractor is traceable to the state or its officers, agents, or employees.

(c) The director shall report progress on release 3 entities’ transition to a new licensing technology platform to all the appropriate committees of the Legislature by December 31 of each year. Progress reports shall include updated plans and timelines for completing all of the following:

(1) Business process documentation.

(2) Cost benefit analyses of information technology options.

(3) Information technology system development and implementation.

(4) Any other relevant steps needed to meet the IT needs of release 3 entities.

(5) Any other information as the Legislature may request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 2.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

156.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, individuals or entities contracting with the department or any board within the department for the provision of services relating to the treatment and rehabilitation of licensees impaired by alcohol or dangerous drugs shall retain all records and documents pertaining to those services until such time as these records and documents have been reviewed for audit by the department. These records and documents shall be retained for three years from the date of the last treatment or service rendered to that licensee, after which time the records and documents may be purged and destroyed by the contract vendor. This provision shall supersede any other law relating to the purging or destruction of records
 pertaining to those treatment and rehabilitation programs.

(b) Unless otherwise expressly provided by statute or regulation, all records and documents pertaining to services for the treatment and rehabilitation of licensees impaired by alcohol or
 dangerous drugs provided by any contract vendor to the department or to any board within the department shall be kept confidential and are not subject to discovery or subpoena.

(c) With respect to all other contracts for services with the
 department, or any board within the department other than those set forth in subdivision (a), the director or chief deputy director may request an examination and audit by the department’s internal auditor of all performance under the contract. For this purpose, all documents and records of the contract vendor in connection with such performance shall be retained by the vendor for a period of three years after final payment under the contract. Nothing in this section shall affect the authority of the State Auditor to conduct any examination or audit under the terms of Section 8546.7 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 42.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

156.5.

The director may negotiate and execute for the department and for its component agencies, rental agreements for short-term hiring of space and furnishings for examination or meeting purposes. The director may, in his or her discretion, negotiate and execute contracts for that space which include provisions which hold harmless the provider of the space where liability resulting from use of the space under the contract is traceable to the state or its officers, agents, or employees. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director may, in his or her discretion, advance payments as deposits to reserve and hold examination or meeting space. Any such agreement is subject to the approval of the legal office of the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1448, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

157.

Expenses incurred by any board or on behalf of any board in any criminal prosecution or unprofessional conduct proceeding constitute proper charges against the funds of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 474.)
-------------------------------------------

158.

With the approval of the Director of Consumer Affairs, the boards and commissions comprising the department or subject to its jurisdiction may make refunds to applicants who are found ineligible to take the examinations or whose credentials are insufficient to entitle them to certificates or licenses.

Notwithstanding any other law, any application fees, license fees, or penalties imposed and collected illegally, by mistake, inadvertence, or error shall be refunded. Claims authorized by the department shall be filed with the State Controller, and the Controller shall draw a warrant against the fund of the agency in payment of the refund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 43.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

159.

The members and the executive officer of each board, agency, bureau, division, or commission have power to administer oaths and affirmations in the performance of any business of the board, and to certify to official acts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1350.)
-------------------------------------------

159.5.

(a) (1) There is in the department the Division of Investigation. The division is in the charge of a person with the title of chief of the division.

(2) Except as provided in Section 160, investigators who have the authority of peace officers, as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 160 and in subdivision (a) of Section 830.3 of the Penal Code, shall be in the division and shall be appointed by the director.

(b) (1) There is in the Division of Investigation the Health Quality Investigation Unit. The primary responsibility of the unit is to investigate violations of law or regulation
 within the jurisdiction of the Medical Board of California, the
 Podiatric Medical Board of California, the Board of Psychology, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the Physician Assistant Board, or any entities under the jurisdiction of the Medical Board of California.

(2) The Medical Board of California shall not be charged an hourly rate for the performance of investigations by the unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 44.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

160.

(a) The chief and all investigators of the Division of Investigation of the department and all investigators of the Dental Board of California have the authority of peace officers while engaged in exercising the powers granted or performing the duties imposed upon them or the division in investigating the laws administered by the various boards comprising the department or commencing directly or indirectly any criminal prosecution arising from any investigation conducted under these laws. All persons herein referred to shall be deemed to be acting within the scope of employment with respect to all acts and matters set forth in this section.

(b) The Division of Investigation of the department and the Dental Board of California
 may employ individuals, who are not peace officers, to provide investigative services.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 515, Sec. 3.   (SB 304)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

160.5.

(a) All civil service employees currently employed by the Board of Dental Examiners of the Department of Consumer Affairs, whose functions are transferred as a result of the act adding this section shall retain their positions, status, and rights pursuant to Section 19050.9 of the Government Code and the State Civil Service Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The transfer of employees as a result of the act adding this section shall occur no later than July 1, 1999.

(b) (1) All civil service employees currently employed by the Medical Board of California of the Department of Consumer Affairs, whose
 functions are transferred as a result of the act adding this subdivision shall retain their positions, status, and rights pursuant to Section 19050.9 of the Government Code and the State Civil Service Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The transfer of employees as a result of the act adding this subdivision shall occur no later than July 1, 2014.

(2) The transfer of employees pursuant to this subdivision shall include all peace officer and medical consultant positions and all staff support positions for those peace officer and medical consultant positions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 515, Sec. 4.   (SB 304)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

161.

The department, or any board in the department, may, in accordance with the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code), make available to the public copies of any part of its respective public records, or compilations, extracts, or summaries of information contained in its public records, at a charge sufficient to pay the actual cost thereof. That charge shall be determined by the director with the approval of the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 3.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

162.

The certificate of the officer in charge of the records of any board in the department that any person was or was not on a specified date, or during a specified period of time, licensed, certified or registered under the provisions of law administered by the board, or that the license, certificate or registration of any person was revoked or under suspension, shall be admitted in any court as prima facie evidence of the facts therein recited.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 355.)
-------------------------------------------

163.

Except as otherwise expressly provided by law, the department and each board in the department shall charge a fee of two dollars ($2) for the certification of a copy of any record, document, or paper in its custody or for the certification of any document evidencing the content of any such record, document or paper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 590.)
-------------------------------------------

163.5.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the delinquency, penalty, or late fee for any licensee within the Department of Consumer Affairs shall be 50 percent of the renewal fee for such license in effect on the date of the renewal of the license, but not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

A delinquency, penalty, or late fee shall not be assessed until 30 days have elapsed from the date that the licensing agency mailed a notice of renewal to the licensee at the licensee’s last known address of record. The notice shall specify the date for timely renewal, and that failure to renew in a timely fashion shall result in the assessment of a delinquency, penalty, or late fee.

In the event a reinstatement or like fee is charged for the reinstatement of a license, the reinstatement fee shall be 150 percent of the renewal fee for such license in effect on the date of the reinstatement of the license, but not more than twenty-five dollars ($25) in excess of the renewal fee, except that in the event that such a fee is fixed by statute at less than 150 percent of the renewal fee and less than the renewal fee plus twenty-five dollars ($25), the fee so fixed shall be charged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 587, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

164.

The form and content of any license, certificate, permit, or similar indicia of authority issued by any agency in the department, including any document evidencing renewal of a license, certificate, permit, or similar indicia of authority, shall be determined by the director after consultation with and consideration of the views of the agency concerned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 850, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

165.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no board, bureau, committee, commission, or program in the Department of Consumer Affairs shall submit to the Legislature any fiscal impact analysis relating to legislation pending before the Legislature until the analysis has been submitted to the Director of Consumer Affairs, or his or her designee, for review and comment. The boards, bureaus, committees, commissions, and programs shall include the comments of the director when submitting any fiscal impact analysis to the Legislature. This section shall not be construed to prohibit boards, bureaus, committees, commissions, and programs from responding to direct requests for fiscal data from Members of the Legislature or their staffs. In those instances it shall be the responsibility of boards, bureaus, committees, commissions, and programs to also transmit that information to the director, or his or her designee, within five working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 268, Sec. 0.2.   Effective June 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

166.

The director shall, by regulation, develop guidelines to prescribe components for mandatory continuing education programs administered by any board within the department.

(a) The guidelines shall be developed to ensure that mandatory continuing education is used as a means to create a more competent licensing population, thereby enhancing public protection. The guidelines shall require mandatory continuing education programs to address, at least, the following:

(1) Course validity.

(2) Occupational relevancy.

(3) Effective presentation.

(4) Actual attendance.

(5) Material assimilation.

(6) Potential for application.

(b) The director shall consider educational principles, and the guidelines shall prescribe mandatory continuing education program formats to include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) The specified audience.

(2) Identification of what is to be learned.

(3) Clear goals and objectives.

(4) Relevant learning methods (participatory, hands-on, or clinical setting).

(5) Evaluation, focused on the learner and the assessment of the intended learning outcomes (goals and objectives).

(c) Any board within the department that, after January 1, 1993, proposes a mandatory continuing education program for its licensees shall submit the proposed program to the director for review to assure that the program contains all the elements set forth in this section and complies with the guidelines developed by the director.

(d) Any board administering a mandatory continuing education program that proposes to amend its current program shall do so in a manner consistent with this section.

(e) Any board currently administering a mandatory continuing education program shall review the components and requirements of the program to determine the extent to which they are consistent with the guidelines developed under this section. The board shall submit a report of their findings to the director. The report shall identify the similarities and differences of its mandatory continuing education program. The report shall include any board-specific needs to explain the variation from the director’s guidelines.

(f) Any board administering a mandatory continuing education program, when accepting hours for credit which are obtained out of state, shall ensure that the course for which credit is given is administered in accordance with the guidelines addressed in subdivision (a).

(g) Nothing in this section or in the guidelines adopted by the director shall be construed to repeal any requirements for continuing education programs set forth in any other provision of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Funds of the Department [200. - 211.]

200.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this code, any revenues, collections, or receipts accruing to any board in the department may, in the manner determined by the director and with the consent of the board concerned, be received and deposited by the department, and in such case shall be accounted for to the board and remitted by the department to the State Treasury in accordance with law for credit to the fund of such board. Notwithstanding Section 158 of this code, all refunds shall be made by the department with the consent of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1426.)
-------------------------------------------

200.1.

(a) Any accruals that occur on or after September 11, 1993, to any funds or accounts within the Professions and Vocations Fund that realize increased revenues to that fund or account as a result of legislation enacted on or after September 11, 1993, and that have not been transferred pursuant to Sections 13.50, 13.60, and 13.70 of the Budget Act of 1993 on the effective date of the act that enacted this section, shall be exempt from the transfers contained in Sections 13.50, 13.60, and 13.70 of the Budget Act of 1993. These funds shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Athletic Commission Fund.

(2) Bureau of Home Furnishings and Thermal Insulation Fund.

(3) Contractors License Fund.

(4) Private Investigator Fund.

(5) Respiratory Care Fund.

(6) Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians Fund.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to the Contingent Fund of the Medical Board of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 6.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

201.

(a) (1) A charge for the estimated administrative expenses of the department, not to exceed the available balance in any appropriation for any one fiscal year, may be levied in advance on a pro rata share basis against any of the boards, bureaus, commissions, divisions, and agencies, at the discretion of the director and with the approval of the Department of Finance.

(2) The department shall submit a report of the accounting of the pro rata calculation of administrative expenses to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature on or before July 1, 2015, and on or before July 1 of each subsequent year.

(b) The department shall conduct a one-time study of its current system for prorating administrative expenses to determine if that system is the most productive, efficient, and cost-effective manner for the department and the agencies comprising the department. The study shall include consideration of whether some of the administrative services offered by the department should be outsourced or charged on an as-needed basis and whether the agencies should be permitted to elect not to receive and be charged for certain administrative services. The department shall include the findings in its report pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) that it is required to submit on or before July 1, 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 395, Sec. 4.   (SB 1243)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

202.

(a) Upon proper presentation of claims by the department to the State Controller, the State Controller shall draw his or her warrant against any of the funds of any one of the boards to cover its share of the estimated administrative expenses of the department. The fund of one board shall not be used to pay the expenses of any other board.

(b) Nothing in this section or in Section 401 shall prohibit the transfer of funds for a release time bank of any board, commission, or bureau of the department pursuant to a memorandum of understanding on the same terms and conditions applicable to other state agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1212, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

202.5.

Prior to payment to the Department of Justice of any charges for legal services rendered to any board within the department, the Department of Justice shall submit to the board an itemized statement of the services and charges. The itemized statement shall include detailed information regarding the services performed and the amount of time billed for each of those services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1273, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

203.

The amount of the warrant shall be remitted to the State Treasurer by the department for credit to the Consumer Affairs Fund. The department shall pay all of its necessary administrative expenses out of the Consumer Affairs Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 716.)
-------------------------------------------

204.

A sum, not to exceed 1 percent of the total amount appropriated for all of the boards herein mentioned may be withdrawn from the Consumer Affairs Fund without at the time furnishing vouchers and itemized statements. This sum shall be used as a revolving fund where cash advances are necessary, and at the close of each biennium, or at any other time, upon demand of the Department of Finance, shall be accounted for and substantiated by vouchers and itemized statements submitted to and audited by the State Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 716.)
-------------------------------------------

205.

(a) There is in the State Treasury the Professions and Vocations Fund. The fund shall consist of the following special funds:

(1) Accountancy Fund.

(2) California Architects Board Fund.

(3) Athletic Commission Fund.

(4) Barbering and Cosmetology Contingent Fund.

(5) Cemetery and Funeral Fund.

(6) Contractors License Fund.

(7) State Dentistry Fund.

(8) California Architects Board-Landscape Architects Fund.

(9) Contingent Fund of the Medical Board of California.

(10) Optometry Fund.

(11) Pharmacy Board Contingent Fund.

(12) Physical Therapy Fund.

(13) Private Security Services Fund.

(14) Professional Engineer’s, Land Surveyor’s, and Geologist’s Fund.

(15) Consumer Affairs Fund.

(16) Behavioral Sciences Fund.

(17) Licensed Midwifery Fund.

(18) Court Reporters’ Fund.

(19) California Veterinary Medical Board Contingent Fund.

(20) Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians Fund.

(21) Acupuncture Fund.

(22) Physician Assistant Fund.

(23) Board of Podiatric Medicine Fund.

(24) Psychology Fund.

(25) Respiratory Care Fund.

(26) Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Fund.

(27) Board of Registered Nursing Fund.

(28) State Dental Hygiene Fund.

(29) Structural Pest Control Fund.

(30) Structural Pest Control Education and Enforcement Fund.

(31) Structural Pest Control Research Fund.

(32) Household Goods and Services Fund.

(33) Naturopathic Doctor’s Fund.

(b) For accounting and recordkeeping purposes, the Professions and Vocations Fund shall be deemed to be a single special fund, and each of the several special funds therein shall constitute and be deemed to be a separate
 account in the Professions and Vocations Fund. Each account or fund shall be available for expenditure only for the purposes as are now or may hereafter be provided by law.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 2.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

205.1.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 205, the Medical Cannabis Regulation and Safety Act Fund is a special fund within the Professions and Vocations Fund, and is subject to subdivision (b) of Section 205.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 32, Sec. 4.   (SB 837)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

205.2.

Whenever any reference is made in any provision of this code to the “State Dental Assistant Fund,” it means the State Dentistry Fund. All moneys within the State Dental Assistant Fund shall be deposited into the State Dentistry Fund by July 1, 2022. On July 1, 2022, the State Dental Assistant Fund shall be abolished.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 4.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

205.3.

Whenever any reference is made in any provision of this code to the “Dispensing Opticians Fund,” it means the Optometry Fund. All moneys within the Dispensing Opticians Fund shall be deposited into the Optometry Fund by July 1, 2022. On July 1, 2022, the Dispensing Opticians Fund shall be abolished.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 121, Sec. 2.   (AB 896)   Effective September 24, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

206.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person tendering a check for payment of a fee, fine, or penalty that was subsequently dishonored, shall not be granted a license, or other authority that they were seeking, until the applicant pays the amount outstanding from the dishonored payment together with the applicable fee, including any delinquency fee. The board may require the person whose check was returned unpaid to make payment of all fees by cashier’s check or money order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 26, Sec. 12.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

207.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money in any fund described in Section 205 that is attributable to administrative fines, civil penalties, and criminal penalties imposed by a regulating entity, or cost recovery by a regulating entity from enforcement actions and case settlements, shall not be continuously appropriated. The money in each fund that is not continuously appropriated shall be available for expenditure as provided in this code only upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the annual Budget Act may appropriate, in a single budget item for each individual fund described in subdivision (a) of Section 205, the
 entire amount available for expenditure in the budget year for that fund. That appropriation may include funds that are continuously appropriated and funds that are not continuously appropriated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 428, Sec. 3.   (AB 177)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

208.

(a) Beginning April 1, 2025, a Controlled Substance Utilization Review and Evaluation System (CURES) fee of fifteen dollars ($15) shall be assessed annually on each of the licensees specified in subdivision (b) to pay the reasonable costs associated with operating and maintaining CURES for the purpose of regulating those licensees. The fee assessed pursuant to this subdivision shall be billed and collected by the regulating agency of each licensee at the time of the licensee’s license renewal. If the reasonable regulatory cost of operating and maintaining CURES is less than fifteen dollars ($15) per licensee, the Department of Consumer Affairs, by regulation, may reduce the fee established by this section to the reasonable regulatory cost.

(b) (1) Licensees authorized pursuant to Section 11150 of the Health and Safety Code to prescribe, order, administer, furnish, or dispense Schedule II, Schedule III, or Schedule IV controlled substances or pharmacists licensed pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 4000) of Division 2.

(2) Licensees issued a license that has been placed in a retired or inactive status pursuant to a statute or regulation are exempt from the CURES fee requirement in subdivision (a). This exemption shall not apply to licensees whose license has been placed in a retired or inactive status if the licensee is at any time authorized to prescribe, order, administer, furnish, or dispense Schedule II, Schedule III, or Schedule IV controlled substances.

(3) Wholesalers, third-party logistics providers, nonresident wholesalers, and nonresident third-party logistics providers of dangerous
 drugs licensed pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 4160) of Chapter 9 of Division 2.

(4) Nongovernmental clinics licensed pursuant to Article 13 (commencing with Section 4180) and Article 14 (commencing with Section 4190) of Chapter 9 of Division 2.

(5) Nongovernmental pharmacies licensed pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 4110) of Chapter 9 of Division 2.

(c) The funds collected pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deposited in the CURES Fund, which is hereby created within the State Treasury. Moneys in the CURES Fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be available to the Department of Consumer Affairs to reimburse the Department of Justice for costs to operate and maintain CURES for the purposes of regulating the licensees specified in subdivision (b).

(d) The Department of Consumer Affairs shall contract with the Department of Justice on behalf of the Medical Board of California, the Dental Board of California, the California State Board of Pharmacy, the California Veterinary Medical Board, the Board of Registered Nursing, the Physician Assistant Board, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the California Board of Naturopathic Medicine, the State Board of Optometry, and the Podiatric Medical Board of California to operate and maintain CURES for the purposes of regulating the licensees specified in subdivision (b).

(e) This section shall become operative on April 1, 2025.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 5) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 4.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

209.

The Department of Justice, in conjunction with the Department of Consumer Affairs and the boards and committees identified in subdivision (d) of Section 208, shall do all of the following:

(a) Identify and implement a streamlined application and approval process to provide access to the CURES Prescription Drug Monitoring Program (PDMP) database for licensed health care practitioners eligible to prescribe, order, administer, furnish, or dispense Schedule II, Schedule III, or Schedule IV controlled substances and for pharmacists. Every reasonable effort shall be made to implement a streamlined application and approval process that a licensed health care practitioner or pharmacist can complete at the time that
 they are applying for licensure or renewing their license.

(b) Identify necessary procedures to enable licensed health care practitioners and pharmacists with access to the CURES PDMP to delegate their authority to access reports from the CURES PDMP.

(c) Develop a procedure to enable health care practitioners who do not have a federal Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA) number to opt out of applying for access to the CURES
 PDMP.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 677, Sec. 2.   (AB 528)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

210.

(a) (1) The department may enter into a contract with a vendor for the BreEZe system, the integrated, enterprisewide enforcement case management and licensing system described in the department’s strategic plan, no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the Appropriations Committees of each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(2) The amount of BreEZe system vendor contract funds, authorized pursuant to this section, shall be consistent with the project costs approved by the office of the State Chief Information Officer based on its review and approval of the most recent BreEZe Special
 Project Report to be submitted by the department prior to contract award at the conclusion of procurement activities.

(3) Paragraph (2) shall apply to all Budget Act items for the department that have an appropriation for the BreEZe system.

(b) (1) If the department enters into a contract with a vendor for the BreEZe system pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall, by December 31, 2014, submit to the Legislature, the Senate Committee on Business, Professions and Economic Development, the Assembly Committee on Business and Professions, and the budget committees of each house, a report analyzing the workload of licensing personnel employed by boards within the department participating in the BreEZe system.

(2) A report to the Legislature pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(3) This subdivision shall become inoperative on December 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon the request of the Department of Consumer Affairs, the Department of Finance may augment the budgets of the boards, bureaus, commissions, committees, programs, and divisions that comprise the Department of Consumer Affairs, as defined in Section 101, for expenditure of non-General Fund moneys to pay BreEZe project costs. The augmentation may be made no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each
 house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or no sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee may in each instance determine. The amount of funds augmented pursuant to the authority of this subdivision shall be consistent with project cost increases approved by the Secretary of California Technology based on the secretary’s review and approval of the most recent BreEZe Special Project Report to be submitted at the conclusion of procurement activities. This subdivision shall apply to all Budget Act items for the boards, bureaus, commissions, committees, programs, and divisions that comprise the Department of Consumer Affairs, as defined in Section 101, that have an appropriation for the BreEZe system in the Budget Act of 2011.

(2) This
 subdivision shall become inoperative upon enactment of the Budget Act of 2012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 46.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

211.

If the department hires a third-party consultant to assess the department’s operations, the department shall, promptly upon receipt of the consultant’s final report on that assessment, submit that report to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature after omitting any information that is not subject to disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 4.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Consumer Affairs [300. - 337.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions [300. - 302.]

300.

This chapter may be cited as the Consumer Affairs Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1394.)
-------------------------------------------

301.

It is the intent of the Legislature and the purpose of this chapter to promote and protect the interests of the people as consumers. The Legislature finds that vigorous representation and protection of consumer interests are essential to the fair and efficient functioning of a free enterprise market economy. The Legislature declares that government advances the interests of consumers by facilitating the proper functioning of the free enterprise market economy through (a) educating and informing the consumer to insure rational consumer choice in the marketplace; (b) protecting the consumer from the sale of goods and services through the use of deceptive methods, acts, or practices which are inimical to the general welfare of consumers; (c) fostering competition; and (d) promoting effective representation of consumers’ interests in all branches and levels of government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1262.)
-------------------------------------------

302.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Department” means the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(b) “Director” means the Director of the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(c) “Consumer” means any individual who seeks or acquires, by purchase or lease, any goods, services, money, or credit for personal, family, or household purposes.

(d) “Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, or other group, however organized.

(e) “Individual” does not include a partnership, corporation, association, or other group, however organized.

(f) “Division” means the Division of Consumer Services.

(g) “Interests of consumers” is limited to the cost, quality, purity, safety, durability, performance, effectiveness, dependability, availability, and adequacy of choice of goods and services offered or furnished to consumers and the adequacy and accuracy of information relating to consumer goods, services, money, or credit (including labeling, packaging, and advertising of contents, qualities, and terms of sales).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Director and Employees [305. - 308.]

305.

The director shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter. Every power granted or duty imposed upon the director under this chapter may be exercised or performed in the name of the director by a deputy or assistant director or the chief of the department’s Division of Consumer Services, subject to such conditions and limitations as the director may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 114.)
-------------------------------------------

306.

The director, in accordance with the State Civil Service Act, may appoint and fix the compensation of such clerical or other personnel as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. All such personnel shall perform their respective duties under the supervision and the direction of the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1394.)
-------------------------------------------

307.

The director may contract for the services of experts and consultants where necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and may provide compensation and reimbursement of expenses for such experts and consultants in accordance with state law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1262.)
-------------------------------------------

308.

The director shall notify the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature within 60 days after the position of chief or executive officer of any bureau or board within the department becomes vacant pursuant to Section 1770 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 376, Sec. 1.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------


